test/src/gt-desc-yamls/V-vaesuemae74_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - väsümä: # Verb (74) väsümä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     väsümä+V+Inf/mA: väsümä
     väsümä+V+Inf: vässüq
     väsümä+V+Act+PrtPrc: väsünüq
     väsümä+V+Pss+PrtPrc: väsüt
     väsümä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: väsü
     väsümä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: väsüs
     väsümä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: vässü
     väsümä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: vässü
